Wyoming, session 2025, HB0205.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

HB0205

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0492
(a) The state fair division within the department of
agriculture and associated functions for the state fair are
transferred by a type 1 transfer, as defined by W.S.
9-2-1707(b)(i), to the Wyoming state fair department
created by this act. All positions, personnel,
appropriations, obligations, property, equipment and
authority associated with the state fair shall be under the
control of the Wyoming state fair department as provided by
this act. The validity of rules, regulations, contracts,
agreements or other obligations of agencies or programs
transferred by this act shall not be affected or impaired
by this act.

(b) Notwithstanding W.S. 11-10-102(c)(vi), as amended
by section 3 of this act, the state fair manager previously
appointed by the state fair board before the effective date
of this act shall serve as temporary director for the
Wyoming state fair department upon the effective date of
this act. As soon as reasonably practicable after the
effective date of this act, the state fair board shall
appoint a director of the Wyoming state fair department in
accordance with this act.

HB0205

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0492
Section 2. W.S. 9-2-2022, 9-2-3301 and 9-2-3302 are
created to read:

9-2-2022. Wyoming state fair department created.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government,
there is created the Wyoming state fair department
consisting of the state fair division within the department
of agriculture as the division existed before July 1, 2025.
The Wyoming state fair department shall not be subject to a
transition period as defined in W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(ix). A
reorganization plan shall not be required of the director
of the Wyoming state fair department.

ARTICLE 33
WYOMING STATE FAIR DEPARTMENT

9-2-3301. Wyoming state fair department created.

There is created the Wyoming state fair department.

9-2-3302. Department director; appointment; removal;
governance; duties of department; budget.
HB0205

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0492

(a) The state fair board shall appoint an executive
director of the department in accordance with W.S.
11-10-102(c)(vi) and with the advice and consent of the
senate.

(b) The executive director's salary shall be
determined by the state fair board.

(c) The executive director shall be the chief
administrative officer of the department and shall have
general supervision of the activities, functions and
employees of the department, subject to the actions and
direction of the state fair board.

(d) The department shall perform all duties specified
by the state fair board and specified in title 11, chapter
10 of the Wyoming statutes.

(e) The department shall submit a budget in
accordance with W.S. 9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014.

HB0205

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0492
Section 3. W.S. 9-2-2016(a), 11-10-101, 11-10-102(a),
(b), (c)(vi) and (viii), 11-10-106(b), 11-10-111 and
11-10-115(a) by creating a new paragraph (x), by amending
and renumbering (x) as (xi) and by renumbering (xi) as
(xii) are amended to read:

9-2-2016. Department of agriculture created; director
appointed; structure.

(a) As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state
government, there is created the department of agriculture
consisting of the existing state department of agriculture,
the agricultural mediation board, the wheat marketing
commission, the Wyoming beef council, the Wyoming weed and
pest council, the board of certification of the
Environmental Pesticide Control Act of 1973, the weed and
pest board of certification, the interstate agricultural
grain marketing commission, the state fair advisory board
and, except for those programs and functions related to the
state fair and otherwise specified in W.S. 11-10-101
through 11-10-118, all programs and functions specified in
titles 11 and 35 and otherwise under law relating to
agriculture and livestock. Except for W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(v)
HB0205

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0492
and (ix), the limitation of number of principal departments
in W.S. 9-2-1704(a) and 9-2-1707(a)(iii) and (iv), the
provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of
1989, W.S. 9-2-1701 through 9-2-1707, apply to this
section.

11-10-101. Annual state fair; where held; purpose;
definitions.

(a) The state fair board, with the assistance of the
Wyoming state fair department, of agriculture, shall hold
an annual state fair at Douglas, Wyoming dedicated to
honoring Wyoming's agricultural heritage and culture by
cultivating Wyoming's agricultural future through
competitions, educational displays and experiential
exhibits for youth producers and the general public.

(b) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Department" means the Wyoming state fair
department;

HB0205

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0492
(ii) "Executive director" means the executive
director of the Wyoming state fair department.

11-10-102. Duties and responsibilities with respect
to the annual state fair and fairgrounds.

(a) The general charge and supervision of the state
fair is under the state fair board with the assistance of
the department. of agriculture.

(b) The department shall prepare budget requests on
behalf of and subject to the approval of the state fair
board for the conduct and management of the annual state
fair and for the operation and maintenance of the state
fairgrounds, including building and facility needs for
major maintenance and repair. Budgets prepared and approved
under this subsection shall be submitted in accordance with
W.S. 9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014.

(c) The state fair board shall:

(vi) To the extent the employment of a state
fair manager would aid in accomplishing the duties required
HB0205

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0492
by this chapter, Appoint a state fair manager executive
director to conduct and supervise the annual state fair and
to manage the year round operation and maintenance of the
state fairgrounds. Any appointment shall be made with the
approval of the governor and the advice and consent of the
senate and shall be subject to removal authority provided
by W.S. 9-1-202. The state fair board may hire and provide
for the supervision of other employees necessary to
accomplish the duties required by this chapter and may
contract for services to advertise and promote the annual
state fair and the fairgrounds;

(viii) Pursuant to W.S. 9-2-3204, make and
execute contracts and other instruments, including
financial contracts and instruments that the state fair
board determines are reasonable and advisable to carry out
the purposes and programs of the state fair board. The
state fair board may authorize the executive director to
make and execute contracts under this paragraph;

11-10-106. Admission charges; other revenues.

HB0205

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0492
(b) The department of agriculture may receive any
money or property of any kind or character donated, granted
or bequeathed for any activities of the state fair. Monies
shall be credited to the Wyoming state fair account except
as otherwise provided by W.S. 11-10-107 and 11-10-118. The
department, on behalf of the state fair board, shall
include within its biennial budget request submitted under
W.S. 9-2-1013 a report itemizing all gifts, income and
expenditures under this subsection, W.S. 11-10-107 and
11-10-118 for each of the immediately preceding two (2)
fiscal years.

11-10-111. Reports.

The executive director of the department of agriculture
shall make reports as required by W.S. 9-2-1014 in regard
to the state fair.

11-10-115. State fair board; membership; terms;
compensation.

(a) There is created the state fair board consisting
of the following members:
HB0205

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0492

(x) The director of the department of
agriculture, or the director's designee, shall serve as a
voting member;

(x)(xi) The executive director, or the
director's designee, shall serve as a voting nonvoting, ex
officio member;

(xi)(xii) The governor or his designee and the
dean of the University of Wyoming college of agriculture,
or the dean's designee, shall serve as nonvoting ex officio
members.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0205